Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-107
Violation; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 66-103 to 66-106 shall upon conviction be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1907, c. 86, § 5, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 5758;

C.S.1922, § 5103;

C.S.1929, § 66-107;

R.S.1943, § 66-107;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 110.